Maryland, session 2025, HB1458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Declaration of Rights
ARTICLE 49.
THAT EVERY PERSON, AS A CENTRAL COMPONENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT
TO LIBERTY AND EQUALITY, HAS THE FUNDAMENTAL RIGHT WHILE ENGAGED IN
EMPLOYMENT IN THE STATE WITH RESPECT TO WHICH THE PAYMENT OF A TIP IS
CUSTOMARY, TO BE PAID AT A WAGE RATE THAT IS AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE STATE
MINIMUM WAGE RATE SET BY LAW WITHOUT REGARD TO TIPS THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
RECEIVES. THE STATE MAY NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, DENY, BURDEN, OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1458*

HOUSE BILL 1458
ABRIDGE THE RIGHT UNLESS JUSTIFIED BY A COMPELLING STATE INTEREST
ACHIEVED BY THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE MEANS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the next general election to be
held in November 2026 for adoption or rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution.
(b) (1) At that general election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the
Constitution shall be by ballot, and on each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the
Constitutional Amendment” and “Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now
provided by law.
(2) At that general election, a question substantially similar to the
following shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State:
“Question ____ Constitutional Amendment
The proposed amendment confirms an individual’s fundamental right, while engaged in
employment in the State with respect to which the payment of a tip is customary, to be paid
at a wage rate that is at least equal to the State minimum wage rate without regard to tips
the individual receives and provides that the State may not, directly or indirectly, deny,
burden, or abridge the right unless justified by a compelling State interest achieved by the
least restrictive means.”.
(c) Immediately after the election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of
the vote for and against the proposed amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution, and further proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.